Florida, session 2026, HB537.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 553.8951, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
553.8951 Temporary door locking devices.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "temporary door
locking device" means a device that prevents a door from opening
and meets all of the following criteria:
(a) Is meant only for temporary use during an emergency
situation.
(b) Can be engaged or removed without opening the door.
(c) Can be engaged and removed from the egress side of the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb537-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 537 2026
door without the use of a key and can be removed from the
ingress side of the door with the use of a key or other
credential.
(d) Does not modify the door closer, panic hardware, or
fire exit hardware.
(e) Is not permanently mounted to the door assembly.
However, individual parts of the temporary door locking device,
including, but not limited to, bolts, stops, brackets, or pins,
which do not prevent normal ingress and egress through the door
may be permanently mounted to the door.
(f) Does not affect the fire rating of the door and
complies with the fire rating standards of the National Fire
Protection Association.
(g) Can be removed with a single operation when engaged.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law or provision in the
Florida Building Code, a temporary door locking device may be
installed at any height above the finished floor.
(3) The Florida Building Commission shall incorporate into
the Florida Building Code pursuant to s. 553.73(1) standards for
temporary door locking devices that meet the requirements of
this section. A temporary door locking device may be used to
secure a fire exit or an entranceway leading to a fire exit if
the temporary door locking device is used only during an
emergency situation and approved by the local enforcement agency
that has jurisdiction over the building in which the device is
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb537-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 537 2026
installed. A temporary door locking device may be applied only
for a finite period of time during an emergency situation,
including, but not limited to, a shelter-in-place order, an
emergency lockdown, or a safety drill for such emergency
situation.
(4) The use of a temporary door locking device must be
integrated into building safety plans, safety drills, and
training programs so that the employees or staff of the building
in which the device is installed has inservice training on the
use of the temporary door locking device.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb537-00